Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Construction of Jails

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

§ 18-6-201.
Construction of jails; authority of county commissioners; plans and specifications; maximum cost permitted; call for bids; limitations applicable only when costs paid from general fund.

Whenever the board of county commissioners deems it in the best interest of the county to have a jail constructed they shall cause plans and specifications for a jail to be prepared by a competent architect. After the plans and specifications are prepared, reviewed and critiqued by the sheriff and adopted by the board of county commissioners they shall deposit them in the office of the county clerk for the county where they shall be available for the inspection of all persons. The board of county commissioners shall give notice that they will receive sealed proposals for the building of the jail according to the plans and specifications by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication in the county’s designated official newspaper once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks. The notices shall state that the commissioners will until a specified day not less than thirty (30) days from publication of the last notice receive sealed proposals for the building of all or part of the jail. Proposals shall be delivered to the county clerk.

This section applies only if the cost of the construction of the jail is to be paid from the general fund of the county. If bonds are to be issued pursuant to W.S.

18-4-302

then the above limitations shall not apply.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to any jail construction project using an alternate design and construction delivery method as defined in W.S.

16-6-701

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 1381; R.S. 1899, § 1037; C.S. 1910, § 1081; Laws 1911, ch. 105, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1314; R.S. 1931, § 29-404; C.S. 1945, § 26-415; W.S. 1957, § 18-292; Laws 1965, ch. 2, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2014 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (c).

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “by posting on the county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication in the county's designated official newspaper once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks” for “by publication in a newspaper once each week for four (4) consecutive weeks in any newspaper of general circulation within the county” in the third sentence and inserted “last” preceding “notice receive” in the fourth sentence.

Stated

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standing of disappointed bidder on public contract to seek damages under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 for public authorities' alleged violation of bidding procedures, 86 ALR Fed 904.

§ 18-6-202.
Construction of jails; opening of bids or proposals; awarding of contract; security for completion; payment; exemption for alternate delivery methods.

On the day appointed for opening the bids the county commissioners shall open and declare the same in public and shall award the contract or contracts to the lowest bidder.

The bids shall be accompanied by a bid bond or other form of bid guarantee satisfactory to the board in an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the aggregate amount of the bid. Before the contract is executed the successful bidder shall furnish to the board a performance and payment bond or other form of surety satisfactory to the board, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the contract price. All bonds provided pursuant to this section shall be executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 3.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to any jail construction project using an alternate design and construction delivery method as defined in W.S.

16-6-701

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 66, §§ 17 to 19; R.S. 1887, §§ 1382 to 1384; 1899, §§ 1038 to 1040; C.S. 1910, §§ 1082, 1084; C.S. 1920, §§ 1315 to 1317; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-405 to 29-407; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-416 to 26-418; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-293 to 18-295; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 3; 2003, ch. 128, § 1; 2006, ch. 98, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (d).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of bidder for state or municipal contract to rescind bid on ground that bid was based upon his own mistake or that of his employee, 52 ALR2d 792, 2 ALR4th 991.